Hawaii statutes.
§667-9 Dower barred, when. If the
mortgage was executed by a man having at the time no lawful wife, or if the
mortgagor being married, his wife joined in the deed in token of her release of
dower, the sale of the property in the mode aforesaid shall be effectual to bar
all claim and possibility of dower in the property. [L 1874, c 33, §3; RL 1925,
§2882; RL 1935, §4727; RL 1945, §12427; RL 1955, §336-8; HRS §667-9; am L 1972,
c 90, §9(h)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next